Hawaii statutes.
§54-31 Name and service of process; claims
against the board. The board of water supply created herein shall be known
as the board of water supply of the county in which it is created, and may sue
and be sued under this name. Service of process in all matters affecting the
board, or any property under its jurisdiction, may be made by service upon any
member of the board or on its manager, and by also serving the county. Any
action commenced or prosecuted for the recovery of damages for any injury to any
person or property by reason of the negligence of the board or of any of its
agents, servants, or employees, shall be commenced and prosecuted against the
board. No action shall be maintained for the recovery of any damage, unless a
written statement verified by the oath of a claimant, setting forth the nature
and items of the claim, and the time and place where the alleged injury may
have occurred or where the damage was sustained, has been filed with the board
within six months after the date of the sustaining of the injury or damage;
otherwise there shall be no recovery on the claim. [L 1961, c 155, pt of §1;
Supp, §145A-21; HRS §54-31; am L 1973, c 134, §3]

Rules of Court

Service of process, see HRCP rule 4(d)(7).

Case Notes

Addition of chlorine to water and board's duty to give
warning. 2 H. App. 221, 629 P.2d 635.

Misnomer in pleadings and process where board was designated
department of water supply did not constitute fatal defect. 2 H. App. 221, 629
P.2d 635.

Previous
Vol02_Ch0046-0115
Next